Washington statutes.
RCW 19.370.040

Violations—Penalties—Attorney general enforcement.

A person who willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter may be liable for a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars per violation. Multiple violations on a single day may be considered separate violations. The attorney general, acting in the name of the state, may seek recovery of all such penalties in a civil action. The attorney general may issue civil investigative demands for the inspection of documents, interrogatory responses, and oral testimony in the enforcement of this section.

[ 2016 c 38 s 4.]